Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.470

Grounds for refusing recognition or enforcement.

(1) Recognition or enforcement of an arbitral award, irrespective of the country in which it was made, may be refused only:

(a) At the request of the party against whom it is invoked, if that party furnishes to the competent court where recognition or enforcement is sought proof that:

(i) A party to the arbitration agreement referred to in RCW 7.05.080 was under some incapacity, or the said agreement is not valid under the law to which the parties have subjected it or, failing any indication thereon, under the law of the country where the award was made;

(ii) The party against whom the award is invoked was not given proper notice of the appointment of an arbitrator or of the arbitral proceedings or was otherwise unable to present its case;

(iii) The award deals with a dispute not contemplated by or not falling within the terms of the submission to arbitration, or contains decisions on matters beyond the scope of the submission to arbitration, provided that, if the decisions on matters submitted to arbitration can be separated from those not so submitted, that part of the award which contains decisions on matters submitted to arbitration may be recognized and enforced;

(iv) The composition of the arbitral tribunal or the arbitral procedure was not in accordance with the agreement of the parties, or, failing such agreement, was not in accordance with the law of the country where the arbitration took place; or

(v) The award has not yet become binding on the parties or has been set aside or suspended by a court of the country in which, or under the law of which, that award was made; or

(b) The court finds that:

(i) The subject matter of the dispute is not capable of settlement by arbitration under the law of this state; or

(ii) The recognition or enforcement of the award would be contrary to the public policy of this state.

(2) If an application for setting aside or suspension of an award has been made to a court referred to in subsection (1)(a)(v) of this section, the court where recognition or enforcement is sought may, if it considers it proper, adjourn its decision and may also, on the application of the party claiming recognition or enforcement of the award, order the other party to provide appropriate security.

[ 2015 c 276 s 47.]